Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3 Health, Educational and Housing Facility Corporations
48-101-310. Bonds of corporation.

Except as herein otherwise expressly provided, all bonds issued by the corporation shall be payable solely out of revenues and receipts derived from the corporation's projects or of any thereof as may be designated in the proceedings of the board of directors under which the bonds shall be authorized to be issued, including debt obligations of the lessee or contracting party obtained from or in connection with the financing of a project; provided, that notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds may be retired out of the proceeds of such bonds.

Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the corporation at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such terms and maturities, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, may bear such conversion privileges and be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state of Tennessee, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the corporation, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the board of directors whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued.

If deemed advisable by the board of directors, there may be retained in the proceedings under which any bonds of the corporation are authorized to be issued, an option to redeem all or any part thereof as may be specified in such proceedings, at such price or prices and after such notice or notices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such proceedings and as may be briefly recited in the face of the bonds, but nothing herein contained shall be construed to confer on the corporation any right or option to redeem any bonds except as may be provided in the proceedings under which they shall be issued.

Any bonds of the corporation may be sold at public or private sale for such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the board of directors of the corporation to be most advantageous, and the corporation may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which its board of directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance of such bonds.

Issuance by the corporation of one (1) or more series of bonds for one (1) or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds in connection with the same project or any other project, but the proceedings whereunder any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds.

Proceeds of bonds issued by the corporation may be used for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, incurring, reconstructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, bettering, or extending any project or projects, including the payment of interest on the bonds during construction of any such project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion, the refinancing of any of the foregoing, the payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural, and legal expenses incurred in connection with such project and the issuance of the bonds, and the establishment of a reasonable reserve fund for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds in the event of a deficiency in the revenues and receipts available for such payment.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the corporation may be used to provide funds to any hospital institution organized not for profit to be used in connection with the operation thereof; provided, that any loan, note, pledge or other obligation under which such funds are provided shall require that a borrowing hospital institution which is in operation on the date it receives such funds shall repay all amounts received for use in connection with its operation within no longer than one (1) year from the date such funds are received by it or that a hospital institution which commences operation after the date it receives such funds shall repay all amounts received for use in connection with its operation within no longer than three (3) years from the date such funds are received by it.

Any bonds or notes of the corporation at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by the corporation by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the board of directors may deem necessary, but not exceeding the sum of the following:

The principal amount of the obligations being refinanced;

Applicable redemption premiums thereon;

Unpaid interest on such obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds;

In the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as hereinafter provided, interest to accrue on such obligations from the date of delivery to the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates selected, in its discretion, by the board of directors, or to the date or dates of maturity, whichever shall be determined by the board of directors to be most advantageous or necessary to the corporation;

A reasonable reserve for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds and/or a renewal and replacement reserve;

If the project to be constructed from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced has not been completed, an amount sufficient to meet the interest charges on the refunding bonds during the construction of such project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion (but only to the extent that interest charges have not been capitalized from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced); and

Expenses, premiums and commissions of the corporation, including bond discount, deemed by the board of directors to be necessary for the issuance of the refunding bonds. A determination by the board of directors that any refinancing is advantageous or necessary to the corporation, or that any of the amounts provided in the preceding sentence should be included in such refinancing, or that any of the obligations to be refinanced should be called for redemption on the first or any subsequent available redemption date or permitted to remain outstanding until their respective dates of maturity, shall be conclusive.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded thereby with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded, or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof to the payment of the obligations to be refunded thereby, and regardless of whether or not the obligations to be refunded were issued in connection with the same projects or separate projects, and regardless of whether or not the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

If, at the time of delivery of the refunding bonds, the obligations to be refunded will not be retired or a valid and timely notice of redemption of the outstanding obligations is not given in accordance with the resolution, indenture or other instrument governing the redemption of the outstanding obligations, then, prior to the issuance of the refunding bonds, the board of directors shall cause to be given a notice of its intention to issue the refunding bonds. The notice shall be given either by mail to the owners of all of the outstanding obligations to be refunded at their addresses shown on the bond registration records for the outstanding obligations or given by publication one (1) time each in the newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality with respect to which the corporation was organized and in a financial newspaper published in New York, New York, having a national circulation. The notice shall set forth the estimated date of delivery of the refunding bonds and identify the obligations, or the individual maturities thereof, proposed to be refunded; provided, that if portions of individual maturities are proposed to be refunded, the notice shall identify the maturities subject to partial refunding in the aggregate principal amount to be refunded within each maturity. If the issuance of the refunding bonds does not occur as provided in the notice, the board of directors shall cause notice thereof to be given as provided above. Except as otherwise set forth in this section, the notice required pursuant to this section shall be given whether or not any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption.

If any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption, the board of directors shall cause notice of redemption to be given in the manner required by the resolution or ordinance authorizing such outstanding obligations.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows: either,

To the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

To the extent not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, then such proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, but provision may be made for the pledging and disposition of any surplus, including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any such surplus to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series of refunding bonds. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States government, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the state of Tennessee if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any obligations having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 9; 1973, ch. 309, § 5; 1976, ch. 514, § 4; 1977, ch. 229, § 2; 1983, ch. 76, § 4; 1983, ch. 187, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-1909; Acts 1985, ch. 243, § 2; 1988, ch. 827, § 1; 1994, ch. 806, § 11; § 48-3-310.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-311. Security for bonds.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the corporation shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the same shall be made payable, and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenues or receipts so pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such projects thereafter made, and by an assignment and pledge of all or any part of the corporation's interest in and rights under the leases, sale contracts or loan agreements relating to such projects, or any thereof.

The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered thereby; the fixing and collection of rents or payments with respect to any projects or portions thereof covered by such resolution, mortgage or deed of trust, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues and from the proceeds of such bonds, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors shall deem advisable and not in conflict with this part.

Each pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the corporation shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the same were made shall have been fully paid. In the event of default in such payment or in any agreement of the corporation made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage and deed of trust executed as security therefor, the payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity or by foreclosure of any such mortgage and deed of trust, or any one (1) or more of these remedies.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 10; 1976, ch. 514, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 48-1910, 48-3-311.

48-101-312. Exemption from taxation — Payments in lieu of taxes — Reporting.

The corporation is hereby declared to be performing a public function in behalf of the municipality with respect to which the corporation is organized and to be a public instrumentality of such municipality. Accordingly, the corporation and all properties at any time owned by it and the income and revenues therefrom and all bonds issued by it and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the state of Tennessee. Also, for purposes of the Securities Act of 1980, compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title, and any amendment thereto or substitution therefor, bonds issued by the corporation shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state of Tennessee.

The municipality may delegate to a corporation the authority to negotiate and enter into with a corporation's lessees, payments in lieu of ad valorem taxes; provided, that such authorization shall be granted only upon a finding that such payments are deemed to be in furtherance of the corporation's public purposes as defined in this subsection (b). The legislative body of the municipality making such delegation may, in its sole discretion, require the corporation to submit any such agreement to the legislative body for its approval.

If the project is located within the corporate limits of a municipality, the payments shall be apportioned between the municipality and the county in the same manner as ad valorem taxes are apportioned on the date of execution of the agreement for payments in lieu of taxes.

The trustee shall bill and collect all in lieu of tax payments based on the agreement and the apportioned taxes.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, and unless the municipality adopts an ordinance or resolution requiring that any agreement with respect to the payments in lieu of taxes entered into pursuant to this subdivision (b)(4) be approved by the municipality, a corporation may negotiate and receive from any lessee of the corporation, without any delegation from the municipality, payments in lieu of taxes with respect to a tax-credit housing project; provided, that:

The payments in lieu of taxes are payable to all applicable taxing jurisdictions in which the project is located and are not less than the taxes that would have been paid to each such taxing jurisdiction for the tax year prior to the year the project became a tax-credit housing project; and

The chief executive officer of the municipality has executed a letter supporting the project that is filed with the corporation.

As used in this subdivision (b)(4), “tax-credit housing project” or “project” means a project that has received an allocation of low-income housing tax credits under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 42), or any successor provision, from the Tennessee housing development agency or is otherwise eligible for the tax credits as the result of the issuance of bonds, the interest on which is not subject to federal income taxation.

In any municipality in which a corporation does not exist or has been administratively dissolved, a housing authority formed by the municipality pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law, compiled in title 13, chapter 20, may negotiate and receive from any lessee payments in lieu of taxes with respect to a tax-credit housing project in accordance with this subdivision (b)(4), and in that case, the housing authority shall have all rights and powers granted to the corporation pursuant to this chapter necessary to acquire and lease a tax-credit housing project in order to effectuate this subdivision (b)(4).

Nothing in this subdivision (b)(4) shall limit the authority of a corporation to negotiate and receive from a lessee of the corporation payments in lieu of taxes with respect to a tax-credit housing project when that authority has been delegated to the corporation by a municipality.

An agreement for payment in lieu of taxes shall contain such terms and conditions as the corporation may determine, which may include, but shall not be limited to, provisions to:

Defer and/or subordinate payment of all or a portion of the payment in lieu of taxes to such future time as the corporation may determine;

Require interest to accrue on such deferred amount;

Require that payments in lieu of taxes, including any interest, expenses or costs of collection of same, shall be secured by a deed of trust upon the project; or

Provide that such deed of trust may be subordinate to other liens or indebtedness of the project.

On or before October 1 each year, the corporation lessee or sublessee shall file with the comptroller of the treasury a report listing leased properties and details of the lease and payment in lieu of tax (PILOT) agreements in the format provided in § 7-53-305. A copy of the report shall be filed with the assessor of property on or before October 15. The assessor may audit or review the report and conduct comparative analysis to ensure that all agreements and reports are filed. Failure to timely complete and file the report with the comptroller of the treasury shall subject the lessee or sublessee to a late filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) payable to the comptroller of the treasury. In addition, failure to file the report with the comptroller of the treasury or assessor within thirty (30) days after written demand for the report shall subject the lessee or sublessee to an additional payment in lieu of tax in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500).

For purposes of this part, the corporation or municipality shall at all times be immune from suit, and any legal and financial obligations whatsoever pertaining to the subject of real property, while the corporation is performing its public function by holding legal title to real property pursuant to a lease and payment in lieu of tax (PILOT) agreement; provided, that the person who transferred title to the corporation or municipality pursuant to such PILOT agreement shall remain liable for suits, and any legal and financial obligations whatsoever, pertaining to the real property.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 11; 1976, ch. 514, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 48-1911, 48-3-312; Acts 1998, ch. 804, § 1; 2000, ch. 914, § 2; 2002, ch. 605, § 2; 2008, ch. 1013, § 6; 2011, ch. 162, § 1; 2015, ch. 519, § 1; 2016, ch. 588, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Acts 1998, ch. 804, § 2, Acts 1998, ch. 804 applies to the 1998 tax year.

Acts 2000, ch. 914, § 3 provided that the act shall apply to reports due for tax year 2000.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-313. Nonliability of municipality.

The municipality shall not in any event be liable for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the corporation, or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement of any kind whatsoever, which may be undertaken by the corporation, and none of the bonds of the corporations or any of its agreements or obligations shall be construed to constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision whatsoever.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 12; T.C.A., §§ 48-1912, 48-3-313.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-314. Disposition of earnings.

The corporation shall be a nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm or corporation, except that in the event the board of directors of the corporation shall determine that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds, and other obligations of the corporation, then any net earnings of the corporation thereafter accruing shall be paid to the municipality with respect to which the corporation was organized; provided, that nothing herein contained shall prevent the board of directors from transferring all or any part of its properties in accordance with the terms of any lease, sale contract, loan agreement, mortgage or deed of trust entered into by the corporation.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 13; 1976, ch. 514, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 48-1913, 48-3-314.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-315. Completion of corporate purpose — Dissolution.

Whenever the board of directors of the corporation shall by resolution determine that the purposes for which the corporation was formed have been substantially complied with and all bonds theretofore issued and all obligations theretofore incurred by the corporation have been fully paid, the then members of the board of directors of the corporation shall thereupon execute and file for record in the office of the secretary of state a certificate of dissolution reciting such facts and declaring the corporation to be dissolved. Such certificate of dissolution shall be executed under the corporate seal of the corporation.

Upon the filing of such certificate of dissolution, the corporation shall stand dissolved, the title to all funds and properties owned by it at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the municipality, and possession of such funds and properties shall forthwith be delivered to such municipality.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 14; T.C.A., §§ 48-1914, 48-3-315.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-316. Joint operation.

The authorities and powers herein conferred upon corporations created under this part may be exercised by two (2) or more such corporations acting jointly. Two (2) or more municipalities may by acting jointly incorporate a public corporation to effectuate the purposes of this part. When two (2) or more municipalities incorporate such a public corporation, each and every requisite pertaining to the application for incorporation, qualifications of applicants, certificate of incorporation and amendment of certificate shall be incumbent in like manner upon each municipality joining in the creation of this public corporation. Officers, but not employees, of a municipality within a public corporation organized among two (2) or more municipalities may serve as directors of such a corporation.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 15; T.C.A., §§ 48-1915, 48-3-316.

48-101-317. Transfer of project sites.

Any municipality may acquire a project site by gift, purchase or lease, and may transfer any project site to a corporation by sale, lease, or gift. Such transfer may be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of the municipality without submission of the question to the voters, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law. Such project site may be within or without the municipality or partially within and partially without the municipality.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 17; T.C.A., §§ 48-1917, 48-3-317.

48-101-318. Construction with other laws — Severability.

Neither this part nor anything herein contained shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the corporation might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the organization of the corporation or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security therefor, except as herein provided, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the corporation, or to impair any power thereover of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions which may be otherwise provided by law.

The powers conferred by this part shall be in addition and supplementary to, and the limitations by this part shall not affect the powers conferred by, any other general, special or local law. Projects may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered and extended and bonds may be issued under this part for these purposes, notwithstanding that any other general, special or local law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extension of a like project, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

If any one (1) or more sections or provisions of this part (including, without limitation, the provisions of § 48-101-317 authorizing the transfer of a project site by a municipality to a corporation and the provisions of § 48-101-312 exempting the corporation and its properties from taxation), or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, shall ever be held by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the remaining provisions of this part and the application thereof to persons or circumstances, other than those to which it is held to be invalid, shall not be affected thereby, it being the intention of the general assembly to enact the remaining provisions of this part, notwithstanding such invalidity.

If any provision of § 48-101-301(8) or § 48-101-301(15)(D), as amended by Acts 1988, ch. 1014, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of § 48-101-301(8) or § 48-101-301(15)(D), as amended by chapter 1014 of the Acts of 1988, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end § 48-101-301(8) or (15)(D), as amended by chapter 1014 of the Acts of 1988, are declared to be severable.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, §§ 16, 18; T.C.A., §§ 48-1916, 48-1918; Acts 1988, ch. 1014, § 3; T.C.A., § 48-3-318.